California, session 20252026, AB768.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 798.21 of the Civil Code is amended to read:798.21. (a) If a mobilehome space within a mobilehome park is not occupied as the actual residence of the homeowner or a tenant for a period of at least 30 consecutive days, used as permanent housing by the homeowner or a tenant approved pursuant to Section 798.23.5, it shall be exempt from any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure adopted by any city, county, or city and county, which establishes a maximum amount that the landlord may charge a tenant for rent.(b) Nothing in this section is intended to require a homeowner to disclose information concerning the homeowner’s personal finances. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize management to gain access to any records which would otherwise be confidential or privileged.(c) Before modifying the rent or other terms of tenancy as a result of learning that the mobilehome space is not occupied as the actual residence of the homeowner or a tenant for a period of at least 30 consecutive days, used as permanent housing as described in subdivision (a), the management shall notify the homeowner, in writing, of the proposed changes and shall provide the homeowner with an explanation of its determination and a copy of the documents upon which management relied. relied in making its determination.(d) (1) The homeowner shall have 90 days from the date the notice described in subdivision (c) is mailed to review and respond to the notice. Management may not modify the rent or other terms of tenancy prior to the expiration of the 90-day period or prior to responding, in writing, to information provided by the homeowner. Management(2) Management may not modify the rent or other terms of tenancy if the homeowner provides documentation reasonably establishing that the information provided by management is incorrect or that the homeowner is not the same person identified in the documents. provides a statement refuting management’s claim that the mobilehome space is not being used as permanent housing as described in subdivision (a). There shall be a rebuttable presumption in favor of the homeowner’s statement and the burden shall be upon the management to show that the space is not being used as permanent housing.(e) This section shall not apply if the mobilehome any of the following are true:(1) The homeowner is unable to rent or lease the mobilehome because the owner or management of the mobilehome park in which the mobilehome is located does not permit, or the rental agreement limits or prohibits, the assignment of the mobilehome or the subletting of the mobilehome space.(2) The mobilehome is being actively held available for sale by the homeowner, or pursuant to a listing agreement with a real estate broker licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10130) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, or a mobilehome dealer, as defined in Section 18002.6 of the Health and Safety Code. A homeowner, real estate broker, or mobilehome dealer attempting to sell a mobilehome shall actively market and advertise the mobilehome for sale in good faith to bona fide purchasers for value in order to remain exempt pursuant to this subdivision.(3) The legal owner has taken possession or ownership, or both, of the mobilehome from a registered owner through either a surrender of ownership interest by the registered owner or a foreclosure proceeding.(f) For purposes of this section, “permanent housing” means a residence where there is clear evidence or intent for the occupancy to be indefinite or for an enduring, continuous period of time. “Permanent housing” does not include a seasonal vacation home or a short-term rental.